Hawaii statutes.
§40-93 Form of notice to appear for
examination.

To.............................

By virtue of the authority vested in me by
chapter 40 of the Hawaii Revised Statutes, you are hereby required to appear
before me at........................on........................and to bring with
you for the purpose of examination a certain book (or as the case may be) and
to be examined by and before me touching and concerning matters required to be
investigated by me pursuant to the provisions of the chapter.

Witness my hand this ..... day of .....,
19.....

...

Comptroller.

[L 1898, c 39, sch D; RL 1925, §1469; RL 1935, §595;
RL 1945, §1599; RL 1955, §34-49; am L 1957, c 152, §1; HRS §40-93]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next